Maryland, session 2026, HB1237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1237*

HOUSE BILL 1237
5–208.
(a) When a pesticide is applied, or at the time a customer enters into a contract
with a licensee for pest control, a licensee shall provide a customer with the following
written information:
(1) Name of licensee;
(2) Maryland pesticide business license number;
(3) Telephone number of licensee;
(4) Common name of pesticide or active ingredient applied;
(5) Pertinent safety information, as determined by the Department,
including health risks for humans and animals, about pesticide in the end–use dilution
applied;
(6) Maryland Poison Center telephone number; and
(7) Any other information required by the Department.
(b) Upon the customer’s request, the licensee shall provide the customer with
advance notice of a pesticide application.
(c) A LICENSEE THAT HAS A SUBSCRIPTION CONTRACT FOR PEST CONTROL
WITH A RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMER SHALL:
(1) INSPECT THE CUSTOMER’S PROPERTY BEFORE EACH PESTICIDE
APPLICATION;
(2) MAKE A GOOD FAITH EFFORT TO COMMUNICATE TO THE
CUSTOMER, BY TELEPHONE OR IN PERSON, THE INSPECTION FINDINGS AND
RECOMMENDATIONS BASED ON THE FINDINGS, INCLUDING ANY
RECOMMENDATIONS REGARDING NONCHEMICAL INTERVENTIONS SUCH AS
SANITATION OR STRUCTURAL REPAIR;
(3) IF CHEMICAL PEST CONTROL METHODS ARE NEEDED,
RECOMMEND THE LEAST TOXIC ALTERNATIVE THAT WILL BE EFFECTIVE FOR THE
TARGETED PESTS; AND
(4) DOCUMENT THE RESULTS OF THE INSPECTION, THE
RECOMMENDATIONS, AND ANY COMMUNICATIONS WITH THE CUSTOMER IN THE
RECORDS REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1237 3
(D) (1) A licensee or public agency permittee applying a pesticide to a lawn or
to exterior landscape plants shall post at the time of application a sign.
(2) The sign shall remain 48 hours following the pesticide application, after
which time the customer is responsible for the removal of the sign.
(3) (i) A person may not remove, alter, or deface the sign or agree or
conspire with another to remove, alter, or deface the sign within 48 hours of its posting.
(ii) The customer or licensee may not be held liable for any penalty
for sign removal under this subtitle if the sign is removed by another person or cause over
which the customer or licensee has no control.
(4) The sign shall:
(i) Be clearly visible either from the principal place of access to the
property; or
(ii) Be clearly visible on the portion of the property where the
pesticide is applied.
(5) The sign shall contain a uniform statement approved by the
Department.
[(d)] (E) Before applying an experimental use pesticide, the holder of the
required experimental use permit from the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency shall
provide the Department with the following information:
(1) Name of cooperator;
(2) Location of planned application or treatment;
(3) Name of active ingredient of pesticide;
(4) Purpose of application or use;
(5) Total acreage being affected by application;
(6) Toxicological profile of pesticide; and
(7) Any other information required by the Department.
5–208.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “REGISTRY” MEANS THE RESIDENTIAL POLLINATOR
PROTECTION AND NEIGHBOR NOTIFICATION REGISTRY.

HOUSE BILL 1237
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A RESIDENTIAL POLLINATOR
PROTECTION AND NEIGHBOR NOTIFICATION REGISTRY FOR THE PURPOSE OF
REGISTERING INDIVIDUALS RESIDING IN RESIDENTIAL AREAS WHO ARE
INTERESTED IN RECEIVING NOTICE OF PESTICIDE APPLICATIONS ON CONTIGUOUS
OR ADJACENT PROPERTIES.
(C) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY APPLY FOR INCLUSION IN THE REGISTRY BY
COMPLETING A REGISTRATION FORM PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE REGISTRATION FORM SHALL, AT A MINIMUM:
(I) REQUIRE THE APPLICANT TO PROVIDE THE NAME, STREET
ADDRESS, AND TELEPHONE NUMBER OF THE APPLICANT AND OF EACH CONTIGUOUS
OR ADJACENT PROPERTY OWNER; AND
(II) INCLUDE CHECKBOXES TO DESIGNATE:
1. WHETHER ANY MEMBER OF THE APPLICANT’S
HOUSEHOLD HAS A PESTICIDE SENSITIVITY OR SHOULD NOT BE EXPOSED TO A
PESTICIDE BECAUSE OF A CURRENT DIAGNOSED CONDITION OR AILMENT;
2. WHETHER PETS OR DOMESTIC ANIMALS RESIDE ON
THE APPLICANT’S PROPERTY; AND
3. WHETHER THE APPLICANT’S PROPERTY INCLUDES A
POLLINATOR GARDEN OR OTHER WILDLIFE HABITAT.
(3) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE REGISTRATIONS TO BE
RENEWED ANNUALLY, ON OR BEFORE A DATE DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY EXTEND OR MAKE EXCEPTIONS TO
THE REGISTRATION DEADLINE FOR REASONABLE CAUSE.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE DEPARTMENT MAY CHARGE A REASONABLE REGISTRATION FEE TO AN
APPLICANT FOR INCLUSION IN THE REGISTRY.
(2) THE FEE SHALL BE ESTABLISHED IN REGULATION AND SHALL BE
DESIGNED TO COVER THE COSTS TO THE DEPARTMENT OF IMPLEMENTING THIS
SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1237 5
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL WAIVE THE REGISTRATION FEE FOR AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO PROVIDES DOCUMENTATION DEMONSTRATING THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL OR A MEMBER OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S HOUSEHOLD SHOULD NOT BE
EXPOSED TO PESTICIDES DUE TO A PESTICIDE SENSITIVITY OR OTHER DIAGNOSED
CONDITION OR AILMENT.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PREPARE FROM THE REGISTRY A LIST
OF:
(I) INDIVIDUALS WHO HAVE REGISTERED WITH THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) PROPERTY OWNERS WHO ARE CONTIGUOUS OR ADJACENT
TO THE REGISTERED INDIVIDUALS AND WHO MAY CONTRACT FOR PEST CONTROL.
(2) THE LIST SHALL INCLUDE NOTICE OF WHETHER THE REGISTERED
INDIVIDUAL HAS INDICATED THE PRESENCE OF A DOMESTIC ANIMAL OR
POLLINATOR GARDEN ON THE INDIVIDUAL’S PROPERTY.
(3) AT A FREQUENCY DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, BUT AT
LEAST ONCE PER YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE LIST TO EACH
LICENSEE.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL IDENTIFY THE PEST CONTROL
CATEGORIES TO WHICH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION APPLY.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO PESTICIDE APPLICATIONS
ON AGRICULTURAL LAND, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE LAND INCLUDES A
RESIDENCE.
(3) BEFORE MAKING A PESTICIDE APPLICATION TO A PROPERTY
CONTIGUOUS OR ADJACENT TO THE PROPERTY OF A REGISTERED INDIVIDUAL, A
LICENSEE SHALL NOTIFY THE INDIVIDUAL:
(I) BY TELEPHONE THE DAY BEFORE, OR THE MORNING OF, A
PLANNED PESTICIDE APPLICATION; OR
(II) IN PERSON, OR BY A WRITTEN NOTICE DELIVERED TO THE
RESIDENCE OF THE INDIVIDUAL, BEFORE THE PESTICIDE IS APPLIED TO A
CONTIGUOUS OR ADJACENT PROPERTY.

HOUSE BILL 1237
(4) ON REQUEST, A LICENSEE OR PUBLIC AGENCY PERMITTEE SHALL
PROVIDE AN INDIVIDUAL NOTIFIED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION WITH THE FOLLOWING
WRITTEN INFORMATION:
(I) THE NAME OF THE LICENSEE;
(II) THE LICENSEE’S MARYLAND PESTICIDE BUSINESS LICENSE
NUMBER;
(III) THE TELEPHONE NUMBER OF THE LICENSEE;
(IV) THE COMMON NAME OF THE PESTICIDE OR ACTIVE
INGREDIENT TO BE APPLIED AND THE EPA REGISTRATION NUMBER; AND
(V) ONE OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. AN ORIGINAL OR A LEGIBLE COPY OF THE CURRENT
PESTICIDE PRODUCT LABEL;
2. AN ORIGINAL OR A LEGIBLE COPY OF THE PORTION
OF THE CURRENT PESTICIDE PRODUCT LABEL CONTAINING PRECAUTIONARY
STATEMENTS REGARDING HAZARDS TO HUMANS OR ANIMALS AND ENVIRONMENTAL
HAZARDS, IF ANY; OR
3. A DOCUMENT CONTAINING APPROPRIATE HEALTH,
SAFETY, OR PRECAUTIONARY INFORMATION THAT HAS BEEN TAKEN FROM THE
PESTICIDE LABEL AND APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT BEFORE DISTRIBUTION.
(5) (I) WHEN MAKING A PESTICIDE APPLICATION TO A PROPERTY
CONTIGUOUS OR ADJACENT TO THE PROPERTY OF A REGISTERED INDIVIDUAL WHO
HAS INDICATED THE PRESENCE OF A DOMESTIC ANIMAL OR POLLINATOR GARDEN
ON THE INDIVIDUAL’S PROPERTY, THE PESTICIDE APPLICATOR SHALL EXERCISE
PARTICULAR CARE TO AVOID APPLYING PESTICIDE NEAR THE POLLINATOR GARDEN
OR DOMESTIC ANIMAL OR ALLOWING ANY PESTICIDE DRIFT TO CONTAMINATE A
POLLINATOR GARDEN OR DOMESTIC ANIMAL.
(II) THE PESTICIDE APPLICATOR SHALL DOCUMENT THE
MEASURES TAKEN UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH AND INCLUDE THE DOCUMENTATION IN
THE RECORDS REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.